Idaho, session 2026, H0909.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Office of the Secretary of State for the
Secretary of State Program the following amounts to be expended according to
the designated expense classes from the General Fund for the period July 1,
2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR:
Personnel Costs $20,000
Operating Expenditures 330,000
TOTAL $350,000
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.